Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cigar bar" means an establishment that:
1. Holds a valid quota retail drink license, as defined in KRS Chapter
243, for the on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages unless a
local government passes an ordinance pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section;
2. Generates at least fifteen percent (15%) of its annual gross income
from the on-site sale of cigars, pipe tobacco, paraphernalia and
accessories related to the consumption of cigars and pipe tobacco, and
rental of humidors, or a combination thereof;
3. Does not knowingly sell products or services, or permit entrance to the
premises, to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age; and
4. Does not permit the use of electronic cigarettes or vapor products or
the smoking of products other than cigars and pipe tobacco inside
interior space of the cigar bar; and
(b) "Local government" means a city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local
government, or special district.
(2) (a) The operation of cigar bars, and the smoking of cigars and pipe tobacco
within the interior or exterior space of a cigar bar, shall be authorized
within the Commonwealth in any area where other establishments that meet
the qualifications of paragraph (a)1. of subsection (1) of this section are
permitted to operate. The operation of a cigar bar is subject to other state
Page 1 of 3
HB021110.100 - 492 - XXXX 2/18/2025 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 211/GA
and local government laws not in conflict with this section, including but
not limited to any land use ordinances generally applicable to licensees
described in paragraph (a)1. of subsection (1) of this section unless a local
government passes an ordinance pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(b) A local government may enact an ordinance requiring a cigar bar to obtain
an annual permit from the local government for its operation. The
ordinance may require an inspection of facilities and other information and
documentation to ensure the applicant complies with the requirements of
this section. The amount of any permit fee:
1. Shall be reasonable and consistent with permit fees for other similar
businesses; and
2. Shall not exceed the costs of policing, regulating, and administering
the cigar bar pursuant to applicable law.
(3) (a) A cigar bar that shares a physical wall or common, enclosed air space with
any other structure shall implement measures or be constructed in a
manner to ensure that smoke from the cigar bar does not pass into the
interior or enclosed air spaces of those other structures.
(b) The owner of a cigar bar shall provide a smoke-free space for the delivery of
supplies, mail, and other items to the premises by persons other than
employees and patrons of the cigar bar. The provisions of this paragraph
shall not apply to any cigar bar in operation as of the effective date of this
Act.
(c) A cigar bar shall provide notice that an individual entering its premises will
be exposed to cigar and pipe tobacco smoke in the establishment and that
smoking or vaporizing of inhalants other than cigars or pipe tobacco is
prohibited. The notice shall be placed in a conspicuous place at each
entrance to the establishment where an entrant may be exposed to cigar or
Page 2 of 3
HB021110.100 - 492 - XXXX 2/18/2025 3:25 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 211/GA
pipe tobacco smoke.
(4) A local government may, by ordinance, allow a cigar bar to operate in its
jurisdiction without holding a valid quota retail drink license, as defined in KRS
Chapter 243 and as otherwise required in subparagraph (a)1. of subsection (1) of
this section. All other provisions of this section shall apply.
Page 3 of 3
HB021110.100 - 492 - XXXX 2/18/2025 3:25 PM GA